Maine, session 132, LD831.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1857-A is enacted to read:
§1857-A. Disposition of vehicle when owner is involuntarily hospitalized
1. Abandonment; involuntary hospitalization. Notwithstanding section 1852, if the
owner of the premises where a vehicle described in section 1851 is located or the owner's
agent has been notified that the vehicle owner is hospitalized pursuant to the process set
forth in Title 34-B, chapter 3, subchapter 4, article 3, the vehicle is considered abandoned
if the owner or lienholder does not retrieve and pay all reasonable charges for towing,
storing and authorized repair of the vehicle within 120 days after the notices to the owner
and lienholder are sent by the Secretary of State or 120 days after the advertisement is
published as required in section 1854, subsection 4. There is a rebuttable presumption that
the last owner of record of a vehicle found abandoned as shown in the files of the office of
the Secretary of State is the vehicle owner at the time it was abandoned and the person who
abandoned it.
2. Notification of vehicle owner. The owner of the premises where a vehicle described
in section 1851 is located, or the owner's agent, shall include any notice described in
subsection 1 in the notice required pursuant to section 1854.
3. Change of ownership. Notwithstanding section 1856, the Secretary of State may
not issue a letter of ownership or certificate of title until at least 120 days after the date on
which the person who has possession of and control over the vehicle notified the Secretary
of State by complying with section 1854, subsection 1 or 1‑A and section 1854, subsection
2.
4. Limits. Notwithstanding section 1857, if the vehicle owner has provided notice
pursuant to subsection 1, the daily total storage charges must be reasonable and total storage
charges may not exceed:
A. Six hundred dollars for the initial 30-day period; and
B. Fifteen hundred dollars for each subsequent 30-day period.
5. Notification of involuntary hospitalization. For purposes of this section, a notice
of involuntary hospitalization may be provided in writing by:
A. The hospital; or
B. The vehicle owner or another individual authorized by the vehicle owner with
supporting documentation of involuntary hospitalization.